Washington statutes.
RCW 25.05.435

Partner—Dissent—Voting restriction.

A partner of a partnership who is entitled to vote on or approve the plan of merger and who wishes to assert dissenters' rights must not vote in favor of or approve the plan of merger. A partner who does not satisfy the requirements of this section is not entitled to payment for the partner's interest in the partnership under this article.

[ 1998 c 103 s 1004.]